Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT ASSOCIATION GENERAL EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT PLAN; SERVICE CREDIT PURCHASE BY AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "city" means the city of Minneapolis; new text end new text begin (2) "executive director" means the executive director of the Public Employees Retirement Association; new text end new text begin (3) "fund" means the general employees retirement fund administered by the Public Employees Retirement Association; and new text end new text begin (4) "general plan" means the general employees retirement plan of the Public Employees Retirement Association. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorization. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, an eligible person described in subdivision 3 is entitled to: new text end new text begin (1) have the city pay the amount required under subdivision 5, paragraph (a), on the eligible person's behalf; and new text end new text begin (2) upon the city making the payments required under subdivision 5, paragraphs (a) and (b), receive credit for allowable service in the general plan for the periods of service described in subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (b) Upon receiving the payments described in subdivision 5, the executive director must credit the eligible person with allowable service for the periods of service described in subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligible person. new text end new text begin An eligible person is a person who: new text end new text begin (1) was initially employed by the city on April 26, 2016, in the fleet services division of the public works department; new text end new text begin (2) received salary for periods of employment with the city that occurred beginning April 26, 2016, through November 4, 2022, and during portions of those periods of employment the city failed to deduct employee contributions and make employer contributions as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 353.27; and new text end new text begin (3) terminated employment with the city on November 4, 2022. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Periods of uncredited prior service. new text end new text begin The periods of uncredited prior service available for purchase are: new text end new text begin (1) April 11, 2017, through October 10, 2017; and new text end new text begin (2) April 27, 2018, through November, 24, 2018. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Payment by employer. new text end new text begin (a) On behalf of the eligible person, the city must pay to the fund an amount equal to the total amount of employee contributions that would have been deducted from the eligible person's salary and paid to the fund based on the eligible person's salary for each period of employment described in subdivision 4, plus interest compounded annually at the applicable annual rate or rates specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 356.59, subdivision 3, from the date each employee contribution deduction should have been paid until the date the payment is made. new text end new text begin (b) The city must pay to the fund an amount equal to the total amount of employer contributions that the city would have made to the fund based on the eligible person's salary for each period of employment described in subdivision 4, plus interest compounded annually at the applicable annual rate or rates specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 356.59, subdivision 3, from the date each employer contribution should have been paid until the date the payment is made. new text end new text begin (c) The executive director must determine the amount of the payments required under paragraphs (a) and (b) and notify the city and the eligible person regarding the amount and the basis for determining the amount. new text end new text begin (d) The city must make the payments required under paragraphs (a) and (b) in a lump sum no later than 60 days after the date on which the executive director notifies the city under paragraph (c). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Collection of unpaid amounts. new text end new text begin If the city fails to make all of the payments required by subdivision 5, the executive director must follow the procedures in Minnesota Statutes, section 353.28, subdivision 6, to collect the amount not paid. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; LOCAL APPROVAL. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Minneapolis City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end